Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.216.556 and 2021 c 199 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Funding for the program of early learning established under this chapter must be appropriated to the department. The department shall distribute funding to approved early childhood education and assistance program contractors on the basis of eligible children enrolled.(2) The program shall be implemented in phases, so that full implementation is achieved in the ((2026-27))2030-31 school year.(3) Funding shall continue to be phased in each year until full statewide implementation of the early learning program is achieved in the ((2026-27))2030-31 school year, at which time any eligible child is entitled to be enrolled in the program. Entitlement under this section is voluntary enrollment.(4) School districts and approved community-based early learning providers may contract with the department to provide services under the program. The department shall collaborate with school districts, community-based providers, and educational service districts to promote an adequate supply of approved providers.Sec. 2. RCW 43.216.505 and 2024 c 225 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 43.216.500 through 43.216.559, 43.216.900, and 43.216.901.(1) "Advisory committee" means the advisory committee under RCW 43.216.520.(2) "Approved programs" means those state-supported education and special assistance programs which are recognized by the department as meeting the minimum program rules adopted by the department to qualify under RCW 43.216.500 through 43.216.550, 43.216.900, and 43.216.901 and are designated as eligible for funding by the department under RCW 43.216.530 and 43.216.540.(3) "Comprehensive" means an assistance program that focuses on the needs of the child and includes education, health, and family support services.(4) "Eligible child" means a three to five-year old child who is not age-eligible for kindergarten, is not a participant in a federal or state program providing comprehensive services, and who:(a) Has a family with an income at or below 50 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size;(b) Is experiencing homelessness;(c) Has participated in early head start or a successor federal program providing comprehensive services for children from birth through two years of age, the early support for infants and toddlers program or received class C developmental services, the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program, or the early childhood intervention and prevention services program;(d) Is eligible for special education due to disability under RCW 28A.155.020;(e) ((Is a member of an assistance unit that is eligible for or is receiving basic food benefits under the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program or the state food assistance program;(f))) Is Indian as defined in rule by the department after consultation and agreement with Washington state's federally recognized tribes pursuant to RCW 43.216.5052 and is at or below 100 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size; or(((g)))(f) Meets criteria under rules adopted by the department if the number of such children equals not more than ten percent of the total enrollment in the early childhood program. Preference for enrollment in this group shall be given to children from families with the lowest income, children in foster care, or to eligible children from families with multiple needs.(5) "Experiencing homelessness" means a child without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as described in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act (Title 42 U.S.C., chapter 119, subchapter VI, part B) as it existed on January 1, 2021.(6) "Family support services" means providing opportunities for parents to:(a) Actively participate in their child's early childhood program;(b) Increase their knowledge of child development and parenting skills;(c) Further their education and training;(d) Increase their ability to use needed services in the community;(e) Increase their self-reliance; and(f) Connect with culturally competent, disability positive therapists and supports where appropriate.Sec. 3. RCW 43.216.578 and 2024 c 225 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Within resources available under the federal preschool development grant birth to five grant award received in December 2018))Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall develop a plan for phased implementation of a birth to three early childhood education and assistance program pilot project for eligible children under thirty-six months old. Funds to implement the pilot project may include a combination of federal, state, or private sources.(2) The department may adopt rules to implement the pilot project and may waive or adapt early childhood education and assistance program requirements when necessary to allow for the operation of the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program. The department shall consider early head start rules and regulations when developing the provider and family eligibility requirements and program requirements. Any deviations from early head start standards, rules, or regulations must be identified and explained by the department in its annual report under subsection (6) of this section.(3)(a) Upon securing adequate funds to begin implementation, the pilot project programs must be delivered through child care centers and family home providers who meet minimum licensing standards and are enrolled in the early achievers program.(b) The department must determine minimum early achievers ratings scores for programs participating in the pilot project.(4) When selecting pilot project locations for service delivery, the department may allow each pilot project location to have up to three classrooms per location. When selecting and approving pilot project locations, the department shall attempt to select a combination of rural, urban, and suburban locations. The department shall prioritize locations with programs currently operating early head start, head start, or the early childhood education and assistance program.(5) ((Until November 1, 2024, to be eligible for the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program, a child's family income must be at or below one hundred thirty percent of the federal poverty level and the child must be under thirty-six months old. Beginning November 1, 2024, to))(a) To be eligible for the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program, a child must be under 36 months old and either:(((a)))(i) From a family with a household income at or below 130 percent of the federal poverty level; or(((b)))(ii) A member of an assistance unit that is eligible for or is receiving basic food benefits under the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program or the state food assistance program.(b) Enrollment of children in the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program is as space is available and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.(6) Beginning November 1, 2020, and each November 1st thereafter during pilot project activity, the department shall submit an annual report to the governor and legislature that includes a status update that describes the planning work completed, the status of funds secured, and any implementation activities of the pilot project. Implementation activity reports must include a description of the participating programs and number of children and families served.Sec. 4. RCW 43.216.578 and 2024 c 225 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall administer a birth to three early childhood education and assistance program for eligible children under thirty-six months old. Funds to implement the program may include a combination of federal, state, or private sources.(2) The department may adopt rules to implement the program and may waive or adapt early childhood education and assistance program requirements when necessary to allow for the operation of the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program. The department shall consider early head start rules and regulations when developing the provider and family eligibility requirements and program requirements.(3)(a) The birth to three early childhood education and assistance program must be delivered through child care centers and family home providers who meet minimum licensing standards and are enrolled in the early achievers program.(b) The department must determine minimum early achievers ratings scores for participating contractors.(4)(a) To be eligible for the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program, a child must be under 36 months old and either:(((a)))(i) From a family with a household income at or below 50 percent of the state median income; or(((b)))(ii) A member of an assistance unit that is eligible for or is receiving basic food benefits under the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program or the state food assistance program.(b) Enrollment of children in the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program is as space is available and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.Sec. 5. RCW 43.216.802 and 2024 c 225 s 1 and 2024 c 67 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) It is the intent of the legislature to increase working families' access to affordable, high quality child care and to support the expansion of the workforce to support businesses and the statewide economy.(2) A family is eligible for working connections child care when the household's annual income is at or below 60 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and:(a) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and(b) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department as authorized by RCW 43.216.055 or 43.216.065 or any other authority granted by this chapter.(3) Beginning July 1, ((2025))2029, a family is eligible for working connections child care when the household's annual income is above 60 percent and at or below 75 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and:(a) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and(b) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department as authorized by RCW 43.216.055 or 43.216.065 or any other authority granted by this chapter.(4) Beginning July 1, ((2027))2031, and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, a family is eligible for working connections child care when the household's annual income is above 75 percent of the state median income and is at or below 85 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and:(a) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and(b) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department as authorized by RCW 43.216.055 or 43.216.065 or any other authority granted by this chapter.(5) Beginning November 1, 2024, when an applicant or consumer is a member of an assistance unit that is eligible for or receiving basic food benefits under the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program or the state food assistance program the department must determine that the household income eligibility requirements in this section are met.(6) The department must adopt rules to implement this section, including an income phase-out eligibility period.(7) The department may not consider the citizenship status of an applicant or consumer's child when determining eligibility for working connections child care benefits.(8) The income eligibility requirements in subsections (2) through (4) of this section do not apply to households eligible for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.808((, 43.216.810, 43.216.812,)) and 43.216.814.Sec. 6. RCW 43.216.804 and 2024 c 67 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Effective until ((July 1, 2025))October 1, 2026, the department must calculate a monthly copayment according to the following schedule((:If the household's income is:Then the household's maximum monthly copayment is:At or below 20 percent of the state median incomeWaived to the extent allowable under federal law; otherwise, a maximum of $15Above 20 percent and at or below 36 percent of the state median income$65Above 36 percent and at or below 50 percent of the state median income$90Above 50 percent and at or below 60 percent of the state median income$165(2) Beginning July 1, 2025, the department must calculate a monthly copayment according to the following schedule)):If the household's income is:Then the household's maximum monthly copayment is:At or below 20 percent of the state median incomeWaived to the extent allowable under federal law; otherwise, a maximum of $15Above 20 percent and at or below 36 percent of the state median income$65Above 36 percent and at or below 50 percent of the state median income$90Above 50 percent and at or below 60 percent of the state median income$165Above 60 percent and at or below 75 percent of the state median income$215(((3)))(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall adopt a copayment model applicable until October 1, 2026, for households with annual incomes above 75 percent of the state median income and at or below 85 percent of the state median income. The model must calculate a copayment for each household that is no greater than seven percent of the household's countable income within this income range.(3) Beginning October 1, 2026, the department must calculate a monthly copayment according to the following schedule:If the household's income is:Then the household's maximum monthly copayment is:Below 25 percent of the state median income$0At or above 25 percent and below 35 percent of the state median income25 percent of the state median income for a household of two, multiplied by five percentAt or above 35 percent and below 45 percent of the state median income35 percent of the state median income for a household of two, multiplied by 5.5 percentAt or above 45 percent and below 55 percent of the state median income45 percent of the state median income for a household of two, multiplied by six percentAt or above 55 percent of the state median income55 percent of the state median income for a household of two, multiplied by 6.5 percent(4) The department may adjust the copayment schedule to comply with federal law.(5) The department must adopt rules to implement this section.(6) This section does not apply to households eligible for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.808((, 43.216.812,)) and 43.216.814.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. (1) In accordance with RCW 43.216.800, authorizations for a working connections child care subsidy are effective for 12 months and any changes related to eligibility in this act only apply to new applications and reapplications. The changes related to eligibility in this act do not apply to consumers who were authorized for a working connections child care subsidy before July 1, 2025 until the next reapplication.(2) The changes related to the copayment schedule in section 6, chapter . . . (ESSB 5752), Laws of 2025 only apply to new applications and reapplications for a working connections child care subsidy. Consumers authorized for a working connections child care subsidy as of October 1, 2026, must not have their copayments adjusted by the schedule in section 6(3), chapter . . . (ESSB 5752), Laws of 2025 until reapplication.(3) This section expires December 31, 2027.Sec. 8. RCW 43.216.806 and 2024 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may not require an applicant or consumer to meet work requirements as a condition of receiving working connections child care benefits when the applicant or consumer is ((in a state registered apprenticeship program or is)) a full-time student of a community, technical, or tribal college and is enrolled in:(i) A vocational education program that leads to a degree or certificate in a specific occupation; or(ii) An associate degree program.(b) An applicant or consumer is a full-time student for the purposes of this subsection if the applicant or consumer meets the college's definition of a full-time student.(c) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may extend the provisions of this subsection to full-time students who are enrolled in a bachelor's degree program or applied baccalaureate degree program.(2) The department must consider an applicant or consumer's participation in the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program or the early head start program as an approved activity when determining eligibility for working connections child care benefits.Sec. 9. RCW 43.216.590 and 2021 c 199 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Beginning July 1, 2022))Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall provide supports to aid eligible providers in providing trauma-informed care. Trauma-informed care supports may be used by eligible providers for the following purposes:(a) Additional compensation for individual staff who have an infant and early childhood mental health or other child development specialty credential;(b) Trauma-informed professional development and training;(c) The purchase of screening tools and assessment materials;(d) Supportive services for children with complex needs that are offered as fee-for-service within local communities; or(e) Other related expenses.(2) This section does not interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the right of family child care providers to bargain collectively with the state through the exclusive bargaining representatives as provided for under RCW 41.56.028.(3) The department must adopt rules to implement this section.(((3)))(4) For the purposes of this section, "eligible provider" means: (a) An employee or owner of a licensed or certified child care center or outdoor nature-based care accepting state subsidy; (b) an employee or owner of a licensed family home provider accepting state subsidy; (c) a contractor or provider of the early childhood education and assistance program or birth to three early childhood education and assistance program; (d) a license-exempt child care program; or (e) an early achievers coach.Sec. 10. RCW 43.216.090 and 2021 c 199 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((The))Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall administer or contract for infant and early childhood mental health consultation services to child care providers and early learning providers participating in the early achievers program.(2) ((Beginning July 1, 2021))Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department ((of children, youth, and families)) must have or contract for one infant and early childhood mental health consultation coordinator and must enter into a contractual agreement with an organization providing coaching services to early achievers program participants to hire at least 12 qualified infant and early childhood mental health consultants. The department shall determine, in collaboration with the statewide child care resource and referral network, where the additional consultants should be sited based on factors such as the total provider numbers overlaid with indicators of highest need. The infant and early childhood mental health consultants must support early achievers program coaches and child care providers by providing resources, information, and guidance regarding challenging behavior and expulsions and may travel to assist providers in serving families and children with severe behavioral needs.(3) The department shall provide, or contract with an entity to provide, reflective supervision and professional development for infant and early childhood mental health consultants to meet national competency standards.(4) As capacity allows, the department may provide access to infant and early childhood mental health consultation services to caregivers and licensed or certified, military, and tribal early learning providers, license-exempt family, friend, and neighbor care providers, and families with children expelled or at risk of expulsion from child care.Sec. 11. RCW 43.216.592 and 2021 c 199 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Beginning July 1, 2022))Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall establish a dual language designation and provide subsidy rate enhancements or site-specific grants for licensed or certified child care providers who are accepting state subsidy((;))or early childhood education and assistance program contractors; or birth to three early childhood education and assistance program contractors. It is the intent of the legislature to allow uses of rate enhancements or site-specific grants to include increased wages for individual staff who provide bilingual instruction, professional development training, the purchase of dual language and culturally appropriate curricula and accompanying training programs, instructional materials, or other related expenses.(2) The department must consult with a culturally and linguistically diverse stakeholder advisory group to develop criteria for the dual language designation.(3) This section does not interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the right of family child care providers to bargain collectively with the state through the exclusive bargaining representatives as provided for under RCW 41.56.028.(4) The department must adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 12. RCW 43.216.512 and 2024 c 225 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall adopt rules that allow the enrollment of children in the early childhood education and assistance program, as space is available, if the number of such children equals not more than 25 percent of total statewide enrollment, when the child is not eligible under RCW 43.216.505 and((:(a) Has))has a family income level above 36 percent of the state median income but at or below 50 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and the child meets at least one of the risk factor criterion described in subsection (2) of this section((; or(b) Is a member of an assistance unit that is eligible for or is receiving basic food benefits under the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program or the state food assistance program)).(2) Children enrolled in the early childhood education and assistance program pursuant to this section must be prioritized for available funded slots according to a prioritization system adopted in rule by the department that considers risk factors that have a disproportionate effect on kindergarten readiness and school performance, including:(a) Family income as a percent of the state median income;(b) Child welfare system involvement;(c) ((Eligible for services under part C of the federal individuals with disabilities education act but not eligible for services under part B of the federal individuals with disabilities education act;(d))) Domestic violence;(((e)))(d) English as a second language;(((f)))(e) Expulsion from an early learning setting;(((g)))(f) A parent who is incarcerated;(((h)))(g) A parent with a behavioral health treatment need; and(((i)))(h) Other risk factors determined by the department to be linked by research to school performance.(3) Children enrolled in the early childhood education and assistance program under this section are not considered eligible children as defined in RCW 43.216.505 and are not considered to be part of the state-funded entitlement required in RCW 43.216.556.(4) This section expires August 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW under the subchapter heading "subsidized child care" to read as follows:(1) The department shall adopt a rule that requires prospective payment to child care providers who accept child care subsidies to occur when child care is expected to begin.(2) The department shall adopt a rule that prohibits child care providers who accept child care subsidies from claiming a prospective payment when a child has not attended at least one day within the authorization period in the previous month.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW under the subchapter heading "subsidized child care" to read as follows:By June 1st of every even-numbered year, the department shall publish a cost of quality child care and market rate study and submit the study to the relevant committees of the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.Sec. 15. RCW 43.216.800 and 2024 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the working connections child care program to promote stability and quality of care for children from low-income households. These policies shall focus on supporting school readiness for young learners. Policies for the expenditure of funds constituting the working connections child care program must be consistent with the outcome measures established by the department and the standards established in this section intended to promote stability, quality, and continuity of early care and education programming.(2) As recommended by P.L. 113-186, authorizations for the working connections child care subsidy are effective for 12 months.(((a) A household's 12-month authorization begins on the date that child care is expected to begin.(b) If a newly eligible household does not begin care within 12 months of being determined eligible by the department, the household must reapply in order to qualify for subsidy.))(3)(a) The department must extend the homeless grace period, as adopted in department rule as of January 1, 2020, from a four-month grace period to a 12-month grace period.(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "homeless" means being without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as described in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a) as it existed on January 1, 2020.(((4) For purposes of this section, "authorization" means a transaction created by the department that allows a child care provider to claim payment for care. The department may adjust an authorization based on a household's eligibility status.))NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 43.216.810 (Expanded eligibilityâRegistered apprenticeships) and 2024 c 67 s 6; and(2) RCW 43.216.812 (Expanded eligibilityâChild care employees) and 2024 c 282 s 2, 2024 c 67 s 7, & 2023 c 222 s 2.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. (1) The department of children, youth, and families must partner with a school district and a metropolitan park district to conduct a pilot to increase access to school-age-only child care programs. The pilot must explore processes and system changes to decrease the administrative, regulatory, and financial burdens on school-age-only child care providers operating in public school buildings.(2) The pilot site must be in a city west of the Cascade mountain range with a population between 215,000 and 250,000 residents and the capacity to serve at least 27,000 students. The park district of the partner site must be willing to provide up to $300,000 in funding to support the work of the partnership, with the total determined after negotiating the workload. The parties may negotiate additional funding by mutual consent, and may also negotiate the addition of other school districts or child care providers by mutual consent.(3) The pilot must operate in at least three school buildings that had a licensed school-age-only child care site in operation during the 2024-2025 school year.(4) The pilot must:(a) Explore and test the feasibility and impact of licensing all child-friendly areas in school buildings; (b) Explore and test methods for streamlining access to the working connections child care program so that the school district, the park district, and their child care partners can expand access for families. The pilot must allow the school district, the park district, and their child care partners access to the online application portal to support application access to working connections child care for families. The department of children, youth, and families must pay providers directly using policies required under the federal child care and development fund; and(c) Identify processes, systems, administrative rules, and statutes, that may need to be added, modified, or eliminated in order to support the objectives identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection.(5) By July 1, 2028, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department of children, youth, and families must submit a report regarding the pilot to the legislature that includes the pilot's successes and challenges, any recommended changes to regulatory requirements, and the pilot's outcomes for child care program staff, school staff, and students.(6) This section expires July 1, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 18. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 19. Except for sections 2 and 4 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2025.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 20. Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 21. (1) Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026.(2) Section 2 of this act takes effect August 1, 2030.Sec. 22. 2021 c 199 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:(1) Section((s 204 through 206 and)) 403 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026.(2) Sections 204 through 206 of this act take effect July 1, 2025.Sec. 23. 2024 c 225 s 7 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:(1) Section 2 of this act takes effect August 1, 2030.((Sections 4 and))(2) Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2025.(3) Section 6 of this act ((take))takes effect July 1, 2026.Sec. 24. 2024 c 225 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:(1) Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2025.((Sections 3 and))(2) Section 5 of this act ((expire))expires July 1, 2026.--- END ---